District of Columbia statutes.
19-1308.15

General powers of trustee.

(a)

A trustee, without authorization by the court, may exercise:

(1)

Powers conferred by the terms of the trust; and

(2)

Except as limited by the terms of the trust:

(A)

All powers over the trust property which an unmarried competent owner has over individually owned property;

(B)

Any other powers appropriate to achieve the proper investment, management, and distribution of the trust property; and

(C)

Any other powers conferred by this chapter.

(b)

The exercise of a power is subject to the fiduciary duties prescribed by this subchapter.

History

Mar. 10, 2004, D.C. Law 15-104, § 2(b), 51 DCR 208

Section References

This section is referenced in § 19-1308.16.

Editor's Notes

Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 815 of the Uniform Trust Code.